Utah statutes.
20A-11-202.   State office candidate -- Personal campaign committee
required.
(1) (a) (i)  Each state office candidate shall select no more than one
personal campaign committee, consisting of one or more persons, to receive
contributions, make expenditures, and file reports connected with the
candidate's campaign.
(ii)  A state office candidate may serve as his own campaign committee.
(b)  Except for expenses made by a registered political party to benefit a
party's candidates generally, a state office candidate or other person acting
in concert with or with the knowledge of the state office candidate may not
receive any contributions or make any expenditures on behalf of a state office
candidate other than through a personal campaign committee established under
this section.
(2) (a)  The state office candidate shall file a written statement signed by
the candidate or authorized member of the candidate's personal campaign
committee with the lieutenant governor that:
(i)  informs the lieutenant governor that the state office candidate's
personal campaign committee has been selected; and
(ii)  provides the name and address of each member and the secretary of the
committee.
(b)  A state office candidate or the candidate's personal campaign committee
may not make any expenditures on behalf of the candidate until the statement
has been filed.
(c)  A state office candidate may revoke the selection of any member of the
campaign committee by:
(i)  revoking that person's appointment or election in writing;
(ii)  personally serving the written revocation on the member whose selection
is revoked; and
(iii)  filing a copy of the written revocation with the lieutenant governor.
(d) (i)  The state office candidate may select a replacement to fill any
vacancy on the campaign committee.
(ii)  The state office candidate shall file that replacement's name and
address with the lieutenant governor.
(3)  A member of a state office candidate's personal campaign committee may
not make an expenditure of more than $1,000 unless the state office candidate
or the secretary of the personal campaign committee authorizes the expenditure
in writing.
(4)  A state office candidate or the candidate's personal campaign committee
may not make any expenditures prohibited by law.
